Hawaii statutes.
§174-6 Further powers. (a) The board
of land and natural resources shall also have power:

(1) To establish the total amount of acreage
assessments to be levied annually within each project;

(2) To set and from time to time revise tolls which
it shall charge for the water provided by its facilities, subject to the rate
policies established hereunder; to establish priorities between the several
lands included in a project according to the use to which the lands are put or
other reasonable basis for classification; to govern the furnishing of water in
the event of a shortage of supply and to correlate water tolls with such
priorities;

(3) To charge and collect such tolls, fees, and other
charges established in connection herewith;

(4) To sell, exchange, transfer, assign, or pledge
any property, real or personal, or any interest therein, to any person, firm,
corporation, or government, except as prohibited by the laws of the State;

(5) To hold, clear, and improve property;

(6) To borrow money for any of the purposes
hereunder;

(7) To insure or provide for the insurance of the
property or operations of the board against such risks as the board may deem
advisable;

(8) To include in any construction contract let in
connection with a project stipulations requiring that the contractor and any
subcontractors comply with requirements as to minimum wages and maximum hours
of labor, and comply with any conditions which the federal government may have
attached to its financial aid of the project.

The board shall also have the power to enter
into any repayment or other contracts with the United States for the
construction, operation, and maintenance of any projects as may be required or
provided for by the federal reclamation laws, or acts amendatory thereof or supplementary
thereto, or other federal laws, and further to borrow money or accept grants or
assistance from the federal government, or any department, bureau, or agency
thereof with respect to the engineering, construction, operation, and financing
of any project hereunder. The board shall make every effort to obtain all
federal aid possible for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) In making surveys, studies, and
investigations, in planning and designing, and in constructing projects and
facilities for economic development, the board shall also have power to include
therein surveys, studies, and investigations of, plans and designs for and
construction of facilities for flood control and the utilization of water for
the production of hydroelectric power, where the same may be practicable in
conjunction with the formation and operation of a project or projects. [L 1961,
c 166, pt of §3; Supp, pt of §86-5; HRS §174-6; am L 1987, c 306, §7]

Case Notes

Board's powers generally and under Small Reclamation Project
Act of 1956. 506 F.2d 572.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next